Illinois, session 104th, SB1265.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Environmental Barriers Act is amended by 5changing Section 6 as follows: 6    (410 ILCS 25/6)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 3716)7    Sec. 6. Enforcement. 8    (a) The Attorney General shall have authority to enforce 9the Code. The Attorney General may investigate any complaint 10or reported violation of this Act and, where necessary to 11ensure compliance, may do any or all of the following:12        (1) Conduct an investigation to determine if a 13    violation of this Act and the Code exists. This includes 14    the power to:15            (A) require an individual or entity to file a 16        statement or report in writing under oath or 17        otherwise, as to all information the Attorney General 18        may consider;19            (B) examine under oath any person alleged to have 20        participated in or with knowledge of the violations; 21        and22            (C) issue subpoenas or conduct hearings in aid of 23        any investigation.   SB1265 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 07333 BDA 17373 b1        (2) Bring an action for injunction to halt 2    construction or alteration of any public facility or 3    multi-story housing or to require compliance with the Code 4    by any public facility or multi-story housing which has 5    been or is being constructed or altered in violation of 6    this Act and the Code.7        (3) Bring an action for mandamus. 8        (4) Bring an action for penalties as follows:9            (A) any owner of a public facility or multi-story 10        housing in violation of this Act shall be subject to 11        civil penalties in a sum not to exceed $250 per day, 12        and each day the owner is in violation of this Act 13        constitutes a separate offense;14            (B) any architect or engineer negligently or 15        intentionally stating pursuant to Section 5 of this 16        Act that a plan is in compliance with this Act when 17        such plan is not in compliance shall be subject to a 18        suspension, revocation, or refusal of restoration of 19        his or her certificate of registration or license 20        pursuant to the Illinois Architecture Practice Act of 21        1989, the Professional Engineering Practice Act of 22        1989, and the Structural Engineering Practice Act of 23        1989; and24            (C) any person who knowingly issues a building 25        permit or other official authorization for the 26        construction or alteration of a public facility or the   SB1265 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 07333 BDA 17373 b1        construction of multi-story housing in violation of 2        this Act shall be subject to civil penalties in a sum 3        not to exceed $1,000. 4        (5) Bring an action for any other appropriate relief, 5    including, but not limited to, in lieu of a civil action, 6    the entry of an Assurance of Voluntary Compliance with the 7    individual or entity deemed to have violated this Act.8    (b) A public facility or multi-story housing continues to 9be in violation of this Act and the Code following 10construction or alteration so long as the public facility or 11multi-story housing is not compliant with this Act and the 12Code. 13    (c) By January 31, 2026, and every January 31 Beginning 14July 31, 2020 and by July 31 of every year thereafter, the 15Attorney General shall provide data on the Attorney General's 16website about annual enforcement efforts performed under this 17Act. The data shall include, but is not limited to, the 18following:19        (1) The total number of open compliance investigations 20    each year.21        (2) The 10 most frequent complaints received under 22    this Act that are under investigation each year.23        (3) The total number of complaints received under this 24    Act annually.25        (4) Assistance provided to constituents throughout the 26    State on the Attorney General's disability rights   SB1265 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 07333 BDA 17373 b1    technical assistance line.2(Source: P.A. 101-537, eff. 8-23-19.) 3    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 4becoming law.